Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Subchapter 5. Miscellaneous Provisions

§ 3191.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 56

, § 25.

§ 3192.
Relation to electronic signatures in global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that act,

15 U.S.C. § 7001(c)

, or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act,

15 U.S.C. § 7003(b)

.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 56

, § 25.

§ 3193.
Transitional provision.

This chapter applies to guardianship and protective proceedings begun on or after July 1, 2011.

Subchapters 1, 3, and 4 of this chapter and sections 3191 and 3192 of this title apply to proceedings begun before July 1, 2011, regardless of whether a guardianship or protective order has been issued.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 56

, § 25.